Connecticut, session 2026, SB00521.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Administrative Services
shall convey to the Northwest Resource Recovery Authority a parcel of
land located in the city of Torrington, and any improvements on such
parcel, at a cost equal to the administrative costs of making such
conveyance. Said parcel of land has an area of approximately 4 acres
and is identified as Lot 002 in Block 001 on city of Torrington Tax
Assessor's Map 114 and contains the Torrington Transfer Station. Said
parcel was transferred to the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to sections 8 to 15, inclusive, of public act 23-170. The
conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties
Review Board.
(b) The Northwest Resource Recovery Authority shall use said parcel
of land for purposes of operating a public transfer station for municipal
solid waste and recycling materials. If the authority:
(1) Does not use said parcel and improvements for said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel and improvements;

Senate Bill No. 521
or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel or improvements,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land and improvements not later than
thirty days after it receives a proposed agreement from the Department
of Administrative Services. The land and improvements shall remain
under the care and control of said department until a conveyance is
made in accordance with the provisions of this section. The State
Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or instrument necessary
for a conveyance under this section, which deed or instrument shall
include provisions to carry out the purposes of subsection (b) of this
section. The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall have the
sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 19, 2026
Special Act No. 26-6 2 of 2